Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 2 Section 1. GENERAL FUND. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of agriculture and land stewardship for the 5 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 6 the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 9 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs, and 10 for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 20,377,294 12 2. Of the amount appropriated in subsection 1, the following 13 amount is transferred to Iowa state university of science and 14 technology, to be used for the universityâs midwest grape and 15 wine industry institute: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 325,000 17 3. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 18 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 19 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 20 expenditure of moneys appropriated in this section to support 21 the departmentâs administration, regulation, and programs. 22 Sec. 2. UNCLAIMED PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING WINNINGS ââ 23 HORSE AND DOG RACING. There is appropriated from the moneys 24 available under section 99D.13 to the department of agriculture 25 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 26 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 27 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 28 designated: 29 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs administration 30 and enforcement of horse and dog racing law pursuant to section 31 99D.22 , including for salaries, support, maintenance, and 32 miscellaneous purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 305,516 34 Sec. 3. RENEWABLE FUEL INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ MOTOR 35 -1- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 1/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ FUEL INSPECTION. There is appropriated from the renewable 1 fuel infrastructure fund created in section 159A.16 to the 2 department of agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal 3 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 4 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 5 used for the purposes designated: 6 For purposes of the inspection of motor fuel, including 7 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 9 Sec. 4. SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND ââ BUTCHERY 10 INNOVATION AND REVITALIZATION PROGRAM. 11 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and 12 job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the department of 13 agriculture and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning 14 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 15 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 16 designated: 17 For support of the butchery innovation and revitalization 18 program established pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 19 1148, section 28, to award financial assistance to eligible 20 businesses for projects based on criteria described in section 21 15E.370: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 249,695 23 2. The department may use not more than 5 percent of the 24 moneys appropriated in subsection 1 to pay for the costs of 25 administering the program described in subsection 1. 26 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 27 subsection 1 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 28 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 29 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 30 close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027. 31 Sec. 5. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 32 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 33 state to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 34 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 35 -2- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 2/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 1 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 2 1. DAIRY REGULATION 3 a. For purposes of performing functions pursuant to section 4 192.109 , including conducting a survey of grade âAâ milk and 5 certifying the results to the secretary of agriculture: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 189,196 7 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 8 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 9 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 10 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 11 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 12 2. LOCAL FOOD AND FARM PROGRAM 13 a. For purposes of supporting the local food and farm 14 program pursuant to chapter 267A : 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 75,000 16 b. The department shall enter into a cost-sharing agreement 17 with Iowa state university of science and technology to support 18 the local food and farm program coordinator position as part of 19 the universityâs cooperative extension service in agriculture 20 and home economics pursuant to chapter 267A . 21 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 22 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 23 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 24 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 25 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 26 3. AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION 27 a. For purposes of allocating moneys to an Iowa association 28 affiliated with a national organization that promotes 29 agricultural education providing for future farmers: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 31 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 32 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 33 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 34 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 35 -3- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 3/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ close of the succeeding fiscal year. 1 4. FOREIGN ANIMAL DISEASES AFFLICTING LIVESTOCK 2 a. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 3 and response fund created in section 163.3B to further 4 implement a foreign animal disease preparedness and response 5 strategy as described in section 163.3C: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,050,000 7 b. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 8 and response fund created in section 163.3B, for purposes 9 of purchasing and maintaining equipment to further the 10 implementation of the foreign animal disease preparedness and 11 response strategy developed under section 163.3C: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 13 c. For deposit in the foreign animal disease preparedness 14 and response fund created in section 163.3B, for purposes of 15 assisting in the development of vaccines against foreign animal 16 diseases by a company based in Iowa that develops livestock and 17 other animal vaccines: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 19 5. FARMERS WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM 20 a. For purposes of supporting a program for farmers with 21 disabilities: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 230,000 23 b. The moneys appropriated in this subsection shall be 24 used for the public purpose of providing a grant to a national 25 nonprofit organization with over 80 years of experience in 26 assisting children and adults with disabilities and special 27 needs. The moneys shall be used to support a nationally 28 recognized program that began in 1986 and has been replicated 29 in at least 30 other states, but is not available through 30 any other entity in this state, and that provides assistance 31 to farmers with disabilities in all 99 counties to allow the 32 farmers to remain in their own homes and be gainfully engaged 33 in farming through provision of agricultural worksite and home 34 modification consultations, peer support services, services 35 -4- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 4/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to families, information and referral, and equipment loan 1 services. 2 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 3 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 4 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 5 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 6 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 7 6. LOESS HILLS DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 8 a. For deposit in the loess hills development and 9 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.2 : 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 11 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 12 $360,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs hungry canyons 13 account. 14 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 15 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 16 c. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 17 $40,000 shall be allocated to the fundâs loess hills alliance 18 account. 19 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys allocated in this 20 paragraph may be used for administrative costs. 21 7. SOUTHERN IOWA DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION FUND 22 a. For deposit in the southern Iowa development and 23 conservation fund created pursuant to section 161D.12: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 25 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 26 this subsection may be used for administrative costs. 27 8. GRAIN REGULATION 28 For the administration and enforcement of chapters 203 29 and 203C , including salaries, support, maintenance, and 30 miscellaneous purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 350,000 32 9. CHOOSE IOWA FUND 33 a. For deposit in the choose Iowa fund created in section 34 187.201: 35 -5- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 5/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,813,000 1 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, 2 the department shall use $463,000 to support the value-added 3 agricultural grant program created in section 187.321. 4 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 5 department shall use $600,000 to support the choose Iowa 6 promotional program as provided in chapter 187, subchapter III, 7 part 1. 8 (3) Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, the 9 department shall use $750,000 to support the dairy innovation 10 and revitalization program created in section 187.311. 11 c. The department may increase or decrease the amount of 12 moneys used to support a program described in paragraph âbâ 13 based on the amount of moneys awarded to persons participating 14 in the program. The department shall publish a notice of the 15 departmentâs action to increase or decrease the amount on the 16 departmentâs internet site where the programs are advertised at 17 least thirty days prior to the day that the department takes 18 such action. 19 10. MARKET REPORTING 20 a. For purposes of continuing data collection and reporting 21 for a daily grain or livestock report: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 23 b. The department shall report data at a minimum at 24 the county level and make the report available for public 25 consumption. 26 11. CHOOSE IOWA FOOD PURCHASING PILOT PROJECT 27 a. For purposes of supporting the choose Iowa food 28 purchasing pilot project to assist eligible participants in 29 purchasing qualified food products pursuant to section 187.304: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 31 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 32 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 33 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 34 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 35 -6- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 6/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ close of the succeeding fiscal year. 1 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 187.304 Choose Iowa food purchasing 2 pilot project. 3 1. There is created within the department a choose Iowa food 4 purchasing pilot project as described in 2024 Iowa Acts, ch. 5 1148, Â§5. 6 2. Except as provided in subsection 3, the department 7 shall administer the pilot project based on the farm-to-school 8 program described in chapter 190A, in which the department 9 reimburses a school or school district for the purchase of a 10 food product originating from a farm source. 11 3. The department shall administer the pilot project 12 according to all of the following: 13 a. A farm or business that owns or operates the farm source 14 shall be given a preference to participate in the pilot project 15 if the farm or business is currently participating in the 16 choose Iowa promotional program as provided in this part 1 of 17 subchapter III. Otherwise, a farm or business may participate 18 in the pilot project if the farm or business has applied to 19 participate in the choose Iowa promotional program and the 20 department determines that the application will be approved. 21 b. An eligible participant is limited to any of the 22 following: 23 (1) A public or private school or a school district, if the 24 public or private school or school district is not currently 25 participating in the farm-to-school program. 26 (2) An Iowa food bank or an Iowa emergency feeding 27 organization, recognized by the department. 28 c. A qualified food product is limited to the following: 29 (1) For a school or school district, meat and poultry, dairy 30 products other than milk, eggs, honey, and produce. 31 (2) For an Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding 32 organization, meat and poultry, dairy products, eggs, honey, 33 and produce. 34 d. The department is not required to follow a requirement in 35 -7- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 7/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ chapter 190A that the department determines is not practical 1 for the pilot project. 2 4. a. Of the moneys appropriated to support the pilot 3 project in a fiscal year, not more than one hundred thousand 4 dollars shall be used to reimburse schools or school districts 5 and not more than one hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be 6 used to reimburse Iowa food banks and Iowa emergency feeding 7 organizations. 8 b. An eligible participant shall be reimbursed on a matching 9 basis with the department contributing one dollar for every one 10 dollar expended by the eligible participant. 11 c. (1) A school or school district shall not receive more 12 than one thousand dollars per fiscal year for participating in 13 the pilot project. 14 (2) An Iowa food bank or Iowa emergency feeding organization 15 shall not receive more than twenty-five thousand dollars per 16 fiscal year for participating in the pilot project. 17 5. The department may use not more than five percent of the 18 moneys appropriated to support the pilot project in a fiscal 19 year to pay for the costs of administering the pilot project. 20 6. The department shall prepare and submit a report 21 regarding its findings and recommendations to the governor and 22 general assembly not later than January 15 of each year. 23 7. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. 24 DIVISION II 25 DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 26 Sec. 7. GENERAL FUND. 27 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 28 to the department of natural resources for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 30 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 For purposes of supporting the department, including its 33 divisions, for administration, regulation, and programs, and 34 for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 35 -8- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 8/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,816,738 1 2. The department shall submit a report each quarter of 2 the fiscal year to the general assembly and the department 3 of management. The report shall describe in detail the 4 expenditure of moneys appropriated under this section to 5 support the departmentâs administration, regulation, and 6 programs. 7 Sec. 8. STATE FISH AND GAME PROTECTION FUND ââ REGULATION 8 AND ADVANCEMENT OF OUTDOOR ACTIVITIES. 9 1. There is appropriated from the state fish and game 10 protection fund created pursuant to section 456A.17 to the 11 department of natural resources for the fiscal year beginning 12 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 13 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 14 designated: 15 For purposes of supporting the regulation or advancement of 16 hunting, fishing, or trapping, or the protection, propagation, 17 restoration, management, or harvest of fish or wildlife, 18 including for administration, regulation, law enforcement, and 19 programs; and for salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, 20 and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 51,404,790 22 2. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may use 23 the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish and game 24 protection fund to provide for the funding of health and life 25 insurance premium payments from unused sick leave balances of 26 conservation peace officers employed in a protection occupation 27 who retire, pursuant to section 97B.49B . 28 3. Notwithstanding section 455A.10 , the department may 29 use the unappropriated balance remaining in the state fish 30 and game protection fund for the fiscal year beginning July 31 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as is necessary to fund 32 salary adjustments for departmental employees for which the 33 general assembly has made an operating budget appropriation in 34 subsection 1. 35 -9- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 9/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Sec. 9. GROUNDWATER PROTECTION FUND ââ WATER QUALITY. There 1 is appropriated from the groundwater protection fund created 2 in section 455E.11 to the department of natural resources for 3 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 4 2026, from those moneys that are not allocated pursuant to 5 that section, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 6 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 7 For purposes of supporting the departmentâs protection 8 of the stateâs groundwater, including for administration, 9 regulation, and programs, and for salaries, support, 10 maintenance, equipment, and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,455,850 12 Sec. 10. SPECIAL SNOWMOBILE FUND ââ SNOWMOBILE 13 PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the special snowmobile 14 fund created under section 321G.7 to the department of natural 15 resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 16 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 17 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 For purposes of administering and enforcing the state 19 snowmobile programs: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 21 Sec. 11. SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS FROM GENERAL FUND TO 22 DEPARTMENT. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 23 state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 24 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 25 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 26 used for the purposes designated: 27 1. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 28 a. For purposes of supporting floodplain management and dam 29 safety: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,510,000 31 b. Of the amount appropriated in this subsection, up to 32 $400,000 may be used by the department to acquire or install 33 stream gages for purposes of tracking and predicting flood 34 events and for compiling necessary data to improve flood 35 -10- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 10/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ frequency analysis. 1 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 2 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 3 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 4 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 5 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 6 2. FORESTRY HEALTH MANAGEMENT 7 a. For purposes of providing for forestry health management 8 programs: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 525,000 10 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 11 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 12 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 13 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 14 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 15 3. STATE PARK OPERATIONS 16 For supporting operations at state parks, including 17 maintenance and repair of grounds and facilities: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 19 DIVISION III 20 IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY 21 Sec. 12. SPECIAL GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS. There is 22 appropriated from the general fund of the state to Iowa state 23 university of science and technology for the fiscal year 24 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 25 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 26 purposes designated: 27 1. VETERINARY DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY 28 a. For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 29 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 30 laboratory: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,500,000 32 b. (1) Iowa state university of science and technology 33 shall not reduce the amount that it allocates to support the 34 college of veterinary medicine from any other source due to the 35 -11- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 11/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ appropriation made in this subsection. 1 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a reduction made 2 to support the college of veterinary medicine if the same 3 percentage of reduction imposed on the college of veterinary 4 medicine is also imposed on all of Iowa state university of 5 science and technologyâs budget units. 6 c. If by June 30, 2026, Iowa state university of science 7 and technology fails to allocate the moneys appropriated in 8 this subsection to the college of veterinary medicine in 9 accordance with this subsection, the moneys appropriated in 10 this subsection for that fiscal year shall revert to the 11 general fund of the state. 12 2. MANAGEMENT OF PRIVATE FORESTS 13 a. For purposes of supporting the Iowa cooperative 14 extension service in agriculture and home economics in 15 providing technical support to landowners and loggers regarding 16 the management of private forests in northeast Iowa: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 150,000 18 b. The department of natural resources shall cooperate with 19 the Iowa cooperative extension service in agriculture and home 20 economics in administering this subsection. 21 3. LIVESTOCK DISEASE RESEARCH 22 a. For deposit in the livestock disease research fund 23 created in section 267.8 : 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 291,390 25 b. Moneys appropriated under this subsection shall be used 26 by Iowa state university of science and technology to support 27 animal disease research in areas of importance to livestock 28 producers. 29 Sec. 13. IOWA NUTRIENT REDUCTION FUND ââ VETERINARY 30 DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY. Notwithstanding section 466B.46, there 31 is appropriated from the Iowa nutrient research fund created 32 in section 466B.46 to Iowa state university of science and 33 technology for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 34 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 35 -12- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 12/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1 For purposes of supporting the college of veterinary 2 medicine for the operation of the veterinary diagnostic 3 laboratory: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 5 DIVISION IV 6 STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 7 Sec. 14. IOWAâS CENTER FOR AGRICULTURAL SAFETY AND HEALTH 8 (I-CASH). 9 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 10 to the state university of Iowa for the fiscal year beginning 11 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, 12 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 13 designated: 14 For supporting the operations of Iowaâs center for 15 agricultural safety and health, as part of the universityâs 16 college of public health, and in cooperation with the 17 department of agriculture and land stewardship, to anticipate, 18 recognize, and prevent occupational illness and injury among 19 members of the agricultural community: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 128,154 21 2. a. As a condition of the appropriation made in 22 subsection 1, the state university of Iowa shall retain the 23 director of Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and health 24 employed on the effective date of this division of this Act for 25 at least the same number of hours for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2025, as worked by the director during the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2024. 28 b. As a condition of the appropriation made in subsection 29 1, the state university of Iowa shall not reduce the amount 30 allocated to support Iowaâs center for agricultural safety and 31 health from any other source due to the appropriation made in 32 subsection 1. 33 3. If by June 30, 2026, the state university of Iowa fails 34 to use the moneys appropriated in subsection 1 in accordance 35 -13- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 13/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ with the purposes and conditions of subsections 1 and 2, any 1 unencumbered or unobligated moneys appropriated in subsection 2 1 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 3 30, 2026, shall revert to the general fund of the state. In 4 addition, if moneys revert as required pursuant to section 5 8.33 , the state university of Iowa shall transfer to the 6 general fund of the state from any otherwise unencumbered or 7 unobligated moneys from any other general fund appropriation or 8 from any moneys available from other funding sources an amount 9 equal to the amount appropriated in subsection 1 less any 10 amount that reverted to the general fund of the state pursuant 11 to section 8.33 . 12 DIVISION V 13 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS 14 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND 15 STEWARDSHIP. There is appropriated from the environment first 16 fund created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 17 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 18 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so 19 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 20 designated: 21 1. CONSERVATION RESERVE ENHANCEMENT PROGRAM (CREP) 22 a. For the conservation reserve enhancement program to 23 restore and construct wetlands for the purposes of intercepting 24 tile line runoff, reducing nutrient loss, improving water 25 quality, and enhancing agricultural production practices: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 27 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 28 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 29 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 30 c. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 31 department may use moneys appropriated in this subsection, 32 in combination with other appropriate environment first 33 fund appropriations, for cost sharing to match United States 34 department of agriculture, natural resources conservation 35 -14- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 14/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ service, wetlands reserve enhancement program (WREP) funding 1 available to Iowa. 2 2. WATERSHED PROTECTION 3 a. For continuation of a program that provides 4 multiobjective resource protections for flood control, water 5 quality, erosion control, and natural resource conservation: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 7 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 8 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 9 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 10 3. CONSERVATION RESERVE PROGRAM (CRP) 11 a. To encourage and assist farmers in enrolling in and the 12 implementation of the federal conservation reserve program and 13 to work with them to enhance their revegetation efforts to 14 improve water quality and habitat: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 900,000 16 b. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated 17 in paragraph âaâ may be used for costs of administration and 18 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 19 4. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION 20 a. For use by the department in providing for soil and water 21 conservation: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,325,000 23 b. (1) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, for 24 transfer to the hungry canyons account of the loess hills 25 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 : 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 140,000 27 (2) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys transferred in 28 subparagraph (1) may be used for administrative costs. 29 c. Of the remaining amount appropriated in paragraph âaâ, 30 for use by the department in providing for soil and water 31 conservation administration, the conservation of soil and 32 water resources, or the support of soil and water conservation 33 districts: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,185,000 35 -15- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 15/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ d. Of the amount appropriated in paragraph âcâ that the 1 department allocates to a soil and water conservation district, 2 the first $15,000 may be expended by the district for the 3 purpose of providing financial incentives under section 161A.73 4 to establish management practices for the control of soil 5 erosion on land that is row-cropped, including but not limited 6 to nontill planting, ridge-till planting, and contouring 7 strip-cropping. Of any remaining amount of that appropriation 8 allocated by the department to a district, 30 percent may be 9 expended by the district for that same purpose. 10 e. Not more than 5 percent of the moneys appropriated in 11 paragraph âcâ may be allocated for cost sharing to address 12 complaints filed under section 161A.47 . 13 f. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ, 5 percent 14 shall be allocated for financial incentives to establish 15 practices to protect watersheds above publicly owned lakes of 16 the state from soil erosion and sediment as provided in section 17 161A.73 . 18 g. The division of soil conservation and water quality 19 created within the department pursuant to section 159.5 may 20 allocate moneys appropriated in paragraph âcâ to conduct 21 research and demonstration projects to promote conservation 22 tillage and nonpoint source pollution control practices. 23 h. The allocation of moneys as financial incentives as 24 provided in section 161A.73 may be used in combination with 25 moneys allocated by the department of natural resources. 26 i. Not more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated 27 in paragraph âcâ may be used for costs of administration and 28 implementation of soil and water conservation practices. 29 5. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION ââ ADMINISTRATION 30 a. For use by the department for costs of administration and 31 implementation of soil and water conservation practices: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,800,000 33 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, $150,000 34 is allocated to support field staff providing technical 35 -16- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 16/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ assistance. 1 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. There is 2 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 3 8.57A to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 5 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 6 used for the purposes designated: 7 1. STATE PARK MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS 8 For regular maintenance and operations of state parks and 9 staff time associated with these activities: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,235,000 11 2. GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM (GIS) 12 To provide local watershed managers with geographic 13 information system data for their use in developing, 14 monitoring, and displaying results of their watershed work: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,000 16 3. WATER QUALITY MONITORING 17 For continuing the establishment and operation of water 18 quality monitoring stations: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,955,000 20 4. PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM ACCOUNT 21 For deposit in the public water supply system account of the 22 water quality protection fund created in section 455B.183A : 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 24 5. REGULATION OF ANIMAL FEEDING OPERATIONS 25 For the regulation of animal feeding operations, including 26 as provided for in chapters 459 , 459A , and 459B : 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,320,000 28 6. FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT AND DAM SAFETY 29 For supporting floodplain management and dam safety: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 375,000 31 7. AMBIENT AIR QUALITY 32 For the abatement, control, and prevention of ambient 33 air pollution in this state, including measures as necessary 34 to assure attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality 35 -17- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 17/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ standards from particulate matter: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,000 2 Sec. 17. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA ââ IOWA GEOLOGICAL 3 SURVEY. There is appropriated from the environment first 4 fund created in section 8.57A to the state university of Iowa 5 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 6 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 7 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 8 1. IOWA GEOLOGICAL SURVEY OPERATIONS 9 For purposes of supporting the operations of the Iowa 10 geological survey of the state as created within the state 11 university of Iowa pursuant to section 456.1 , including but not 12 limited to providing analysis; data maintenance, collection, 13 and compilation; investigative programs; and information for 14 water supply development and protection: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 16 2. WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 17 For purposes of supporting the Iowa geological survey in 18 measuring, assessing, and evaluating the quantity of water 19 sources in this state and assisting the department of natural 20 resources in regulating water quantity as provided in chapter 21 455B, subchapter III, part 4 , pursuant to sections 455B.262B 22 and 456.14 : 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 495,000 24 Sec. 18. REVERSION. 25 1. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ, and 26 notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for the 27 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of this 28 Act that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 29 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 30 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 31 the succeeding fiscal year, or until the project for which the 32 appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 33 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated for 34 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, in this division of 35 -18- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 18/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ this Act to the department of agriculture and land stewardship 1 to provide financial assistance for the establishment of 2 permanent soil and water conservation practices that remain 3 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 4 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 5 for the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2028. 7 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to moneys transferred 8 pursuant to this division of this Act to the loess hills 9 development and conservation fund created in section 161D.2 , 10 which shall not revert as provided in that section. 11 DIVISION VI 12 ENVIRONMENT FIRST FUND ââ SPECIAL APPROPRIATIONS 13 Sec. 19. WATER QUALITY INITIATIVE ââ DEPARTMENT OF 14 AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP. 15 1. There is appropriated from the environment first fund 16 created in section 8.57A to the department of agriculture 17 and land stewardship for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 18 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so 19 much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 20 designated: 21 For deposit in the water quality initiative fund created in 22 section 466B.45 , for purposes of supporting the water quality 23 initiative administered by the division of soil conservation 24 and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , including 25 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,375,000 27 2. a. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be 28 used to support projects in subwatersheds as designated by the 29 division that are part of high-priority watersheds identified 30 by the water resources coordinating council established 31 pursuant to section 466B.3 . 32 b. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used to 33 support projects in watersheds generally, including regional 34 watersheds, as designated by the division and high-priority 35 -19- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 19/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ watersheds identified by the water resources coordinating 1 council established pursuant to section 466B.3 . 2 3. In supporting projects in subwatersheds and watersheds 3 as provided in subsection 2, all of the following apply: 4 a. The demonstration projects shall utilize water quality 5 practices as described in the Iowa nutrient reduction strategy 6 as defined in section 455B.171 . 7 b. The division shall implement demonstration projects as 8 provided in paragraph âaâ by providing for participation by 9 persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used in 10 farming. To every extent practical, the division shall provide 11 for collaborative participation by such persons who hold a 12 legal interest in agricultural land located within the same 13 subwatershed. 14 c. The division shall implement a demonstration project on 15 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. However, 16 except for edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the 17 amount shall not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of 18 establishing the practice as determined by the division or 19 50 percent of the actual cost of establishing the practice, 20 whichever is less. 21 d. The demonstration projects shall be used to educate other 22 persons about the feasibility and value of establishing similar 23 water quality practices. The division shall promote field day 24 events for purposes of allowing interested persons to establish 25 water quality practices on their agricultural land. 26 e. The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 27 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 28 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 29 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 30 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 31 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 32 land shall be a confidential record under section 22.7 . 33 4. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall be used 34 to support education and outreach in a manner that encourages 35 -20- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 20/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land used for 1 farming to implement water quality practices, including the 2 establishment of such practices in watersheds generally, and 3 not limited to subwatersheds or high-priority watersheds. 4 5. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used 5 to contract with persons to coordinate the implementation of 6 efforts provided in this section. 7 6. The moneys appropriated in subsection 1 may be used by 8 the department to support urban soil and water conservation 9 efforts, which may include but are not limited to management 10 practices related to bioretention, landscaping, the use of 11 permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality restoration. 12 The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share basis as provided 13 in chapter 161A . 14 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 15 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in 16 subsection 1 to carry out the provisions of this section on a 17 cost-share basis in combination with other moneys available to 18 the department from a state or federal source. 19 8. Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 20 this section may be used to pay for the costs of administering 21 and implementing the water quality initiative by the 22 departmentâs division of soil conservation and water quality as 23 provided in section 466B.42 and this section. 24 DIVISION VII 25 RESOURCES ENHANCEMENT AND PROTECTION ââ OPEN SPACES 26 Sec. 20. REAP ââ IN LIEU OF GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION. In 27 lieu of the standing appropriation in section 455A.18 , there is 28 appropriated from the environment first fund created in section 29 8.57A to the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund 30 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 31 30, 2026, the following amount, to be allocated as provided in 32 section 455A.19 : 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,000,000 34 Sec. 21. REAP ââ OPEN SPACES ACCOUNT ââ STATE PARK 35 -21- LSB 1010XG (6) 91 sb/js 21/ 23 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ MAINTENANCE, OPERATIONS, AND FACILITY REFURBISHMENT. 1 Notwithstanding section 455A.19, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, 2 subparagraph (1), of the moneys allocated to the open spaces 3 account of the Iowa resources enhancement and protection fund, 4 up to $1,000,000 may be used by the department of natural 5 resources for state park maintenance, development, operations, 6 and facility refurbishment for the fiscal year beginning July 7 1, 2025, and ending on June 30, 2026. 8